apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="ým/is__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sir</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sar</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>san</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sar</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sum</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>issi</l>      <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>su</l>        <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sum</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sum</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sum</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iss</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>issar</l>     <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iss</l>       <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>issa</l>      <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>issa</l>      <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>issa</l>      <r>is<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ýmis">            <i>ým</i><par n="ým/is__adj"/></e>
